Connecticut, session 2026, HB05369.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force
to (1) evaluate the calculation of the threshold at or above which the
affordable housing appeals procedure outlined in section 8-30g of the
general statutes is not available; (2) evaluate the moratorium process
described in subsection (l) of section 8-30g of the general statutes; (3)
evaluate the length of deed restrictions required for the award of
housing unit-equivalent points for proposed developments pursuant to
section 8-30g of the general statutes; (4) recommend changes, if any, to
section 8-30g of the general statutes to improve the effectiveness and
clarity of the provisions outlined in subdivisions (1) to (3), inclusive, of
this subsection; (5) examine existing state and local regulatory barriers
to developing missing middle housing and recommend statutory,
regulatory and administrative solutions to encourage missing middle
housing development, including, but not limited to, revisions to the
HB5369 / File No. 748


HB5369 File No. 748
State Building Code, and State Fire Safety and State Fire Prevention
Codes; and (6) recommend changes to state law to reduce barriers to the
development of missing middle housing. For the purposes of this
section, "missing middle housing" means duplexes, triplexes,
quadplexes, cottage clusters and townhouses consisting of sixteen units
or fewer.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom is a public safety official;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom is an employee of the Department of Administrative Services;
(3) Two appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(4) Two appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(5) Two appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives; and
(6) Two appointed by the minority leader of the Senate.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly. Not more than six members total may be
members of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
HB5369 / File No. 748


HB5369 File No. 748
days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The chairpersons of the task force may, at their discretion, appoint
additional nonvoting members of the task force.
(g) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to housing
shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(h) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to housing,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
The task force shall terminate on the date that it submits such report or
January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
HB5369 / File No. 748


HB5369 File No. 748
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill establishes a task force to evaluate the calculation associated
with the affordable housing appeals procedure and to make certain
recommendations resulting in no fiscal impact to the state because the
task force has the expertise and capacity to meet the requirements of the
bill.
House "A" alters the scope of the task force's duties and the
composition of the task force resulting in the impact described above.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5369 / File No. 748


HB5369 File No. 748
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5369 (as amended by House "A")
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A TASK FORCE ON THE CALCULATION
OF AFFORDABILITY IN THE AFFORDABLE HOUSING APPEALS
PROCESS.